csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: nimikaagoominaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagosiiminaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagosiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: gimikaagoosiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagominaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagominaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagonaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: gimikaagoominaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: gimikaagoosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagonaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagonaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: gimikaagoomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagosiiminaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagosiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: gimikaagoosiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimikaagominaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagominaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagonaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: gimikaagoominaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagosiiwaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagosiiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagosiiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagosiiwaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagosiinigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagosiigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagosiiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagosiiwangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mikoosinowagoogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mikoosiinowaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawagwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawagen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawagen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mikawisiiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawegwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mikawisiiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mikawisiiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawadwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawaden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawaden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mikawisiiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawisiiwaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mikaagoosiiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoosiinowegwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasiwaawaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mikawisiiwangidwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mikoosiinowangwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagosiiwaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagosiigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawisiigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mikaagoosiiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoosiinowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasiigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mikawisiiwangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mikoosiinowangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mikoosiinogwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mikoosiinogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawangidwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawangwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: mikaagoosiiwaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: mikaagoosiiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: mikaagoosiiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiwaawindwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwaawinden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiwaawinden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: mikaagoosiiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: mikaagoosiiwangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagowaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagowanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagowaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagonigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagowaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagowangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mikoonagoogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mikoonowaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawaawagwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawagen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawaawagen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mikawiwegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawaawegwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawaawegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mikawiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mikawiwanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawaawadwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawaden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawaawaden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mikawiwaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawiwaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mikaagoowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoonowegwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaawaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mikawiwangidwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mikoonowangwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagowaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawigwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mikaagoowanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoonowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaagwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mikawiwangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mikoonowangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mikoonogwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mikoonogwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mikawaawangidwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mikawaawangiden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaawangwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaawangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: mikaagoowaanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: mikaagoowegwen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: mikaagoowanen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mikawaawindwaawen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaawinden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mikawaawinden
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: mikaagoowaangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: mikaagoowangen
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagosiwaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagosiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagosiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagosigwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagosinig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagosig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagosiwaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagosiwang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mikoosinowagog
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mikoosinowaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwagwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwag
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwag
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mikawisiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwegwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mikawaasiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mikawisiwaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mikawisiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawaasiwadwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawaasiwad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mikawisiwaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mikawisigwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mikoosinowegwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mikoosinokwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasigwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mikawisiwangidwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mikoosinowangwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mikaagosigwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mikaagosig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mikawisig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mikoosinoweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mikoosinok
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawaasig
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mikawisiwangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mikoosinowang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mikaagosiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mikaagoosiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwangidwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwangid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mikawaasiwangwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mikawaasiwang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: mikaagoosiwaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: mikaagoosiweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: mikaagoosiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiwindwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimaasiwind
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiwind
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: mikaagoosiwaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: mikaagoosiwang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mikaagoyaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mikaagoyeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mikaagoyan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mikaagowaad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikaagonid
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mikaagod
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mikaagoyaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mikaagoyang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mikoonagog
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mikoonaan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mikawagwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimag
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mikawag
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mikawiyeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mikawegwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimeg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mikaweg
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mikawiyaang
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mikawiyan
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mikawadwaa
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mikawimad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mikawad
     mikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mikawiyaang
